Maryland, session 2026, HB1618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–608.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DEDICATED NAVIGATOR” MEANS A REPRESENTATIVE
FROM THE DEPARTMENT OR FROM A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ASSISTANCE AGENCY OR
ORGANIZATION WHO:
(1) IS IN PERSONAL CONTACT WITH A PERMIT APPLICANT; AND
(2) ASSISTS THE APPLICANT IN THE PERMIT APPLICATION PROCESS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1618*

HOUSE BILL 1618
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO APPLICATIONS FOR PERMITS ISSUED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 2, TITLE 4, TITLE 9, AND TITLE 16 OF THIS ARTICLE BY A
PERSON CONDUCTING OR OPERATING A TRADE OR BUSINESS THAT IS PRIMARILY
ENGAGED IN ACTIVITIES THAT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE NORTH AMERICAN
INDUSTRIAL CLASSIFICATION SYSTEM (NAICS), UNITED STATES MANUAL,
UNITED STATES OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET, 2012 EDITION, WOULD BE
INCLUDED IN SECTOR 31, 32, OR 33.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
COORDINATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, SHALL ADOPT
PROCEDURES TO STREAMLINE THE PERMITTING PROCESS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION.
(2) A STREAMLINED PERMITTING PROCESS ADOPTED UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) REQUIRE THE DEPARTMENT TO ISSUE A DETERMINATION
ON A PERMIT APPLICATION WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE
DEPARTMENT RECEIVES THE PERMIT APPLICATION;
(II) PROVIDE FOR A DEDICATED NAVIGATOR; AND
(III) ESTABLISH A SINGLE DIGITAL PORTAL THROUGH WHICH
PERMIT APPLICATIONS MAY BE SUBMITTED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.